Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Chapter 55. Alaska Entity Transactions Act.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause declaring that this chapter does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014, see sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.